Massachusetts, session 194th, H824.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Section 1 of chapter 50 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition is hereby amended by striking out the word “fifty” in line 85 and putting in place thereof
the words: “five hundred”.
Section 2. Section 1 of Chapter 50 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition is hereby amended by inserting after the word “first.” in line 94 the words: “If, after the
expiration of two years from the date the political designation is approved, there are fewer than
one quarter of one percent of the total number of registered voters enrolled in the designation, it
shall be dissolved and any such voters enrolled shall be registered as “unenrolled.”
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1